Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SEVERE WINTER WEATHER SPECIALIZED EQUIPMENT STUDY.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of transportation must conduct a study to analyze and examine the state's ability to deploy specialized equipment for clearing snow and ice from roads and highways in the event of severe winter weather. At a minimum, the study must analyze: (1) the state's supply of and additional need for specialized equipment; (2) plans and procedures for deploying specialized equipment; (3) the capabilities and limitations of existing specialized equipment; (4) the cost of acquiring new specialized equipment; and (5) potential partnerships with neighboring states to coordinate responses to winter storms and sharing of specialized equipment. The commissioner must solicit feedback from each regional district in the state when conducting the study. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must submit a copy of the study to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance by February 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must use existing funds to conduct the study. new text end